Utah statutes.
54-4a-2.   Director of division -- Appointment -- Authority and
responsibility.
The director of the Division of Public Utilities shall be appointed by the
executive director of the Department of  Commerce and shall serve at the
pleasure of the executive director.   The director of the Division of Public
Utilities is subject to the administrative authority of the executive director
of the Department of Commerce and is responsible for the administration and
supervision of the division.  The director of the Division of Public Utilities
shall have authority to adopt internal organizational measures to effectuate
efficiency and economy in the management and operation of the division.
